Louisiana, session 2026, HB740.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:460.81(B) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
46:460.51(18) and 460.81(E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§460.51. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the meaning ascribed in this
Section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(18) "Coordinated System of Care" or "CSoC" means a coordinated network
of resources made available through the Louisiana Department of Health,
Department of Children and Family Services, state Department of Education, and the
office of juvenile justice to create access to care for families of children who have
complex behavioral health needs and who are either in or at risk of being in
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 740 ENROLLED
out-of-home placement through development of a care plan that includes intensive,
individualized community based services.
* * *
§460.81. Right of providers to independent review; applicability
* * *
B.(1) The provisions of this Subpart shall not apply to any adverse
determination associated with a claim filed with a managed care organization prior
to January 1, 2018, regardless of whether the claim is re-filed after that date. For all
adverse determinations related to claims filed on or after January 1, 2018, the state
shall not mandate that the provider and managed care organization resolve the claim
payment dispute through arbitration.
(2)(a) The provisions of this Subpart shall not apply to any adverse
determination associated with a claim filed prior to January 1, 2027, to individuals
enrolled with an entity contracted with the state to administer the Coordinated
System of Care program. In addition, for all adverse determinations related to claims
filed on or after January 1, 2027, the state shall not mandate that the provider and
entity contracted with the state to administer the Coordinated System of Care
program resolve claim payment disputes through arbitration.
(b) The Louisiana Department of Health shall ensure that the independent
review entity shall make determinations that are consistent with standards, policies,
and procedures outlined in the Coordinated System of Care contract and statement
of work and that medical necessity determinations are consistent with appropriate
medical necessity criteria approved by the department for the Coordinated System
of Care program.
C. An adverse determination involved in litigation or arbitration or not
associated with a Medicaid enrollee an individual enrolled in the Coordinated
System of Care or Medicaid shall not be eligible for independent review under the
provisions of this Subpart.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 740 ENROLLED
E. For purposes of this Subpart, "managed care organization" has the same
meaning as set forth in R.S. 46:460.51 and also means any entity contracted with the
state to administer the Coordinated System of Care program.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.